Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB104.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 19-2670 is hereby amended to read as follows:
19-2670. There shall may be created and established a citizens
commission on local government in every county in this state having a
population of more than one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) and
not more than two hundred thousand (200,000). Such commission shall
consist of:
(1)(a) The board of county commissioners of the county;
(2)(b) the governing body of all cities of the first class located in
such county;
(3)(c) the trustee of each township in such county;
(4)(d) the chairmen of the boards of education of all school
districts located in such county;
(5)(e) the chairmen of boards of public utilities of all cities located
in such county;
(6)(f) the chairmen of boards of all drainage districts located
within such county;
(7)(g) the mayors of all cities of the second and third class located
in such county; and
(8)(h) eighteen (18) persons who shall be selected and appointed
by the members hereinbefore provided described in paragraphs (a)
through (g). Such persons shall be residents of the county and shall not
be officers or employees of the county or any city, school district,
township, board of public utilities or drainage district.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 19-2670 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
_________________________
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
________________________
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.